Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.070

Submission of ballot propositions to the voters.

(1) Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, or a single county legislative authority as provided under RCW 36.120.030(8), upon receipt of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040, may submit to the voters of the proposed district a single ballot proposition that approves formation of the district, approves the regional transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue sources necessary to finance the plan. For a county to participate in the plan, the county legislative authority shall, within ninety days after receiving the plan, adopt an ordinance indicating the county's participation. The planning committee may draft the ballot proposition on behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the county legislative authorities may give notice as required by law for ballot propositions, and perform other duties as required to submit the proposition to the voters of the proposed district for their approval or rejection. Counties may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan. The electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the proposed district. A simple majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot proposition is required for approval.

(2) The participating counties shall submit a regional transportation investment plan at the 2007 general election as part of a single ballot proposition that includes, in conjunction with RCW 81.112.030(10), a plan to support an authority's system and financing plan, or additional implementation phases of the system and financing plan, developed under chapter 81.112 RCW. The regional transportation investment plan shall not be considered approved unless both a majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing in the proposed district vote in favor of the proposition and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing within the regional transit authority vote in favor of the proposition.

[ 2007 c 509 s 2; 2006 c 311 s 8; 2002 c 56 s 107.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 509: "The legislature finds that traffic congestion reduces personal and freight mobility and is detrimental to the economy, air quality, and the quality of life throughout the central Puget Sound area. Effective transportation solutions are essential for the future growth and development of the central Puget Sound area and the welfare of its citizens.

The legislature further finds that investments in both transit and road improvements are necessary to relieve traffic congestion and to improve mobility. The transportation improvements proposed by regional transportation investment districts and regional transit authorities within the central Puget Sound region form integral parts of, and are naturally and necessarily related to, a single regional transportation system. The construction of road and transit projects in a comprehensive and interrelated manner will help reduce transportation congestion, increase road capacity, promote safety, facilitate mobility, and improve the health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of Washington.

The legislature further finds that under RCW 81.112.030 and * 36.120.170 regional transportation investment districts and regional transit authorities are required to submit to the voters propositions for their respective transportation plans on the same ballot at the 2007 general election and that the opportunity to propose a single ballot reflecting a comprehensive, systemic, and interrelated approach to regional transportation would further the legislative intent and provide voters with an easier and more efficient method of expressing their will.

It is therefore the policy and intent of the state of Washington that transportation plans required to be submitted for voter approval at the 2007 general election by a regional transportation investment district and a regional transit authority must be submitted to voters in single ballot question seeking approval of both plans." [ 2007 c 509 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: Reference to RCW 36.120.170 appears to be erroneous. The correct reference should be to RCW 36.120.070.

Constitutional challenges—Expedited appeals—2007 c 509: "Any legal challenges as to the constitutionality of this act must be filed in superior court along with any supporting legal and factual authority within twenty calendar days of May 15, 2007. Notice of a challenge along with any supporting legal and factual authority must be served upon the secretary of state, the attorney general, the district, and the authority. Upon the filing of a challenge, the state, district, and authority have ten calendar days to file any response to the challenge along with any supporting legal and factual authority. The court shall accord priority to hearing the matter and shall, within five calendar days of the filing of the response to the challenge, render its decision and file with the secretary of state a copy of its decision. The decision of the superior court constitutes a final judgment. Any appeal must be filed in the supreme court within ten calendar days after the date of the superior court decision. The supreme court shall issue its ruling on the appeal within thirty days of receipt by the court." [ 2007 c 509 s 5.]

Severability—2007 c 509: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 509 s 6.]

Effective date—2007 c 509: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 15, 2007]." [ 2007 c 509 s 7.]

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.